Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-2116
Utilities district; power of eminent domain; exercise.

(1) In addition to any other rights and powers conferred upon metropolitan utilities districts under sections 14-2101 to 14-2157, such districts shall have and may exercise the power of eminent domain for the purpose of erecting, constructing, locating, maintaining, or supplying such waterworks, gas works, or mains or the extension of any system of waterworks, water supply, gas works, or gas supply, and any such district may go beyond its territorial limits and may take, hold, or acquire rights, property, and real estate, or either or any of the same, by purchase or otherwise. Such a district may for such purposes take, hold, and condemn any and all necessary property.

(2) Any metropolitan utilities district shall have the power to condemn or to exercise the power of eminent domain to acquire parts of an existing utility's facilities only when such facilities are within, annexed to, or otherwise consolidated within the corporate boundary limits of a city of the metropolitan class. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724. Within a municipal county, the power to condemn or to exercise the power of eminent domain for purposes of this subsection may be exercised by a metropolitan utilities district to the extent and in the manner provided by the Legislature as required by section 13-2802.

Laws 1957, c. 21, § 1, p. 154;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1103.02;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 16;

Laws 2001, LB 142, § 30.